Ohio, session 136, SJR2.
Be it Enacted by the 167
People of the State of Ohio," and of all constitutional 168
amendments: "Be it Resolved by the People of the State of Ohio." 169
The basis upon which the required number of petitioners in any 170
case shall be determined shall be the total number of votes cast 171
for the office of governor at the last preceding election 172
therefor. The foregoing provisions of this section shall be 173
self-executing, except as herein otherwise provided. Laws may be 174
passed to facilitate their operation, but in no way limiting or 175
restricting either such provisions or the powers herein 176
reserved. 177

S. J. R. No. 2 Page 7
As Introduced
EFFECTIVE DATE 178
If adopted by a majority of the electors voting on this 179
proposal, Sections 1b and 1g of Article II amended by this 180
proposal shall take immediate effect and the existing versions 181
of Sections 1b and 1g of Article II of the Constitution of the 182
State of Ohio shall be repealed from that effective date. 183